lexc/noun/enhumelytny.lexc
!!!enhuoa.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§J§ §JP§ 
§VV§ §uue2§ §AE21§
§UUE2§ §OEOE25§ §UUE21§ §AE22§ §OEOE22§ §oooe2§ §oeoez22§
§AAA2§ §oeoe2§ §AA2§ §oeoez25§ §JJ§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ §oeoez17§
§OEOE17§ §EOA17§ §ooez18§ §UUE3§
      
LEXICON Root
Noun ;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;


LEXICON Noun
Aulich AddNoun1;
Bachrich AddNoun1;
Bakách AddNoun1;
Balatony AddNoun;
Batthyány AddNoun;
Bedekovich AddNoun1;
Blaskovich AddNoun1;
Blazovich AddNoun1;
Bogdanich AddNoun1;
Bogisich AddNoun1;
Bogovich AddNoun1;
Boháty AddNoun;
Damjanich AddNoun1;
Dolly AddNoun;
Dudich AddNoun1;
Dumbovich AddNoun1;
Epiphany AddNoun;
Fabchich AddNoun1;
Folly AddNoun;
Forgách AddNoun1;
Gallowich AddNoun1;
Gasparich AddNoun1;
Grassalkovich AddNoun1;
Grubich AddNoun1;
Gách AddNoun1;
Haraszty AddNoun;
Hatvany AddNoun;
Haubrich AddNoun1;
Huszty AddNoun;
Jakubovich AddNoun1;
Jankovich AddNoun1;
Janny AddNoun;
Joannovich AddNoun1;
Josipovich AddNoun1;
Jurisich AddNoun1;
Jurkovich AddNoun1;
Kamilly AddNoun;
Kitonich AddNoun1;
Kollonich AddNoun1;
Kommenovich AddNoun1;
Kossovich AddNoun1;
Kovachich AddNoun1;
Kovách AddNoun1;
Krisztinkovich AddNoun1;
Kulich AddNoun1;
Lacsny AddNoun;
Laczkovich AddNoun1;
Lampich AddNoun1;
Lovrekovich AddNoun1;
Lovrich AddNoun1;
Lubrich AddNoun1;
Lukachich AddNoun1;
Lukinich AddNoun1;
Madách AddNoun1;
Mamusich AddNoun1;
Marich AddNoun1;
Marinovich AddNoun1;
Markovich AddNoun1;
Mattanovich AddNoun1;
Mentovich AddNoun1;
Mihailich AddNoun1;
Mihalovich AddNoun1;
Modrovich AddNoun1;
Novotny AddNoun;
Pasquich AddNoun1;
Patachich AddNoun1;
Petrovich AddNoun1;
Povolny AddNoun;
Purgly AddNoun;
Pály AddNoun;
Radich AddNoun1;
Reguly AddNoun;
Rosty AddNoun;
Saágy AddNoun;
Simonchich AddNoun1;
Somssich AddNoun1;
Stansych AddNoun1;
Subich AddNoun1;
Szucsich AddNoun1;
Takách AddNoun1;
Ticharich AddNoun1;
Tomasich AddNoun1;
Voinovich AddNoun1;
Vojnich AddNoun1;
Vojnovich AddNoun1;
Volny AddNoun;
Vuchetich AddNoun1;
Vörösmarty AddNoun;
Wolny AddNoun;
Zelovich AddNoun1;
Zách AddNoun1;
Áprily AddNoun;


LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam11;
![stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Gen11;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez18§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA17§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or               #;    ! kor
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Sup:^+cSup^n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Fac:^+cFac^v§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Ins:^+cIns^v§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§JJ§§AE21§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE3§nk   Fam;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^t§OEOE25§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§JJ§§UUE21§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JJ§§AE22§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JJ§§AE22§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JJ§§AE22§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JJ§§AE22§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JJ§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JJ§§AE22§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                                    Gen11;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^k    Gen;
                            Case11;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;
LEXICON Fam11
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen11;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;

LEXICON Gen11
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case11;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez22§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

 
LEXICON Case11
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez22§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
!+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
!+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
!+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor


LEXICON AddNoun1
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss1;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur1;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam1;

LEXICON Poss1
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez18§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA17§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE17§m   Fam1;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE17§d   Fam1;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Fam1;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fam1;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE17§t§OEOE25§k   Fam1;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Fam1;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fam1;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Fam1;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Fam1;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Fam1;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fam1;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Fam1;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam1;

LEXICON Plur1
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Gen1;
                            Gen1;
        
LEXICON Fam1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen1;
                       Gen1;

LEXICON Gen1
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case1;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case1;
                       Case1;
 
LEXICON Case1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez22§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor
